Utah statutes.
48-1-19.   Right to an account.
Any partner shall have the right to a formal account as to partnership
affairs:
(1)  If he is wrongfully excluded from the partnership business or possession
of its property by his copartners.
(2)  If the right exists under the terms of any agreement.
(3)  As provided by Section 48-1-18.
(4)  Whenever other circumstances render it just and reasonable.
